Washington statutes.
RCW 19.134.030

Surety bond and trust account—Exception to requirement.

If a credit services organization is in compliance with *RCW 19.134.020(1), the salesperson, agent, or representative who sells the services of that organization is not required to obtain a surety bond and establish a trust account.

[ 1986 c 218 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 19.134.020 was amended by 2023 c 144 s 2, changing subsection (1) to subsection (1)(a).